Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 23. Mississippi Children’s Museum

§ 39-23-1.
Recognition of need for Mississippi Children’s Museum.

The Legislature recognizes the need for a children’s museum in Mississippi to promote the educational and social development, well-being and joy of children. The Legislature further recognizes that a children’s museum would be of great economic and cultural importance to Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 535, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 39-23-3.
Location of Mississippi Children’s Museum.

The Mississippi Children’s Museum may be located:

At the old National Guard Armory located on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds in Jackson, Mississippi, after the repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of such facility by the Department of Finance and Administration as provided for in Sections 16 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended;

In such structure and at such location as shall be submitted by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Children’s Museum, a Mississippi nonprofit corporation, to and approved as an appropriate structure and location by the Department of Finance and Administration, after the repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of such facility by the Department of Finance and Administration as provided in Sections 16 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended; or

In the building, formerly known as the Mississippi Museum of Natural Science, on land located adjacent to the State Fairgrounds in the City of Jackson, County of Hinds, Mississippi, described more specifically as follows:

Starting at the point of intersection of the

North line of Pearl Street and the West line of

Jefferson Street, run Northerly along the West

line of Jefferson Street a distance of 240 feet

to the point of beginning, an iron pin.

Continue Northerly along the West line of

Jefferson Street for a distance of 257.9 feet to

an iron pin; turn left through an angle of 89 degrees -

57 minutes – 14 seconds and run Westerly for a

distance of 278.9 feet to an iron pin on the east

right-of-way line of the G.M. & O. Railroad; turn

left through an angle of 79 degrees – 29 minutes -

30 seconds and run Southerly along the East right-of-way

of the G.M. & O. Railroad (Said line being a curve

to the left with a radius of 2814.93 feet, chord

definition) for a distance of 260.4 feet to an iron

pipe; turn left through an angle of 95 degrees – 12

minutes – 26 seconds and run Easterly and parallel

with the North line of this tract for a distance of

314.7 feet to the point of beginning.

On certain real property owned by the State of Mississippi and held by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, more particularly described as follows:

39 acres lying in the northeast corner of the

intersection of Mississippi 25 and Interstate 55.

At any location in Hinds County as shall be submitted by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Children’s Museum, a Mississippi nonprofit corporation, to the Department of Finance and Administration and approved as an appropriate location by the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 535, § 17; Laws, 1999, ch. 589, § 134; Laws, 2001, ch. 600, § 61; Laws, 2004, ch. 451, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 39-23-5.
Repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of facility.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with the repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of the old National Guard Armory on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds, or another structure if approved by the Department of Finance and Administration as provided in Section 17 of Chapter 589, Laws of 1999, for its use as a children’s museum as soon as practicable.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with the repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of the facility at the location described in Section 39-23-3(c) as soon as practicable.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with the construction, furnishing and equipping of a facility at the location described in Section 39-23-3(d), if the location at such site is approved by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Children’s Museum and the Department of Finance and Administration, as soon as practicable.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with the construction, furnishing and equipping of a facility at a location selected as provided in Section 39-23-3(e), if the location is approved by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Children’s Museum and the Department of Finance and Administration, as soon as practicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 535, § 18; Laws, 1999, ch. 589, § 135; Laws, 2001, ch. 600, § 62; Laws, 2004, ch. 451, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 39-23-7.
Lease of facility to nonprofit corporation.

If the old National Guard Armory is repaired, renovated, furnished and equipped as provided for in Sections 39-23-1 through 39-23-7 and Sections 20 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended, the Mississippi Fair Commission shall lease the facility for a period not exceeding twenty (20) years to a nonprofit corporation whose primary purpose for incorporation is the support and improvement of a children’s museum in Mississippi. The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease shall be considered as sufficient consideration. The lease shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease shall not amount to a donation of state property.

If the facility at the location described in Section 39-23-3(c) is repaired, renovated, furnished and equipped as provided for in Sections 39-23-1 through 39-23-7 and Sections 20 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended, the Department of Finance and Administration shall lease the facility for a period not exceeding twenty (20) years to a nonprofit corporation whose primary purpose for incorporation is the support and improvement of a children’s museum in Mississippi. The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease shall be considered as sufficient consideration. The lease shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease shall not amount to a donation of state property.

If the facility at the location described in Section 39-23-3(d) is constructed, furnished and equipped as provided for in Sections 39-23-1 through 39-23-7 and Sections 20 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended, the Department of Finance and Administration shall lease the facility for a period not exceeding twenty (20) years to a nonprofit corporation whose primary purpose for incorporation is the support and improvement of a children’s museum in Mississippi. The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease shall be considered a sufficient consideration. The lease shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease shall not amount to a donation of state property.

If the facility at a location selected as provided in Section 39-23-3(e), to include the approval of any using and/or controlling agency, board or commission of the proposed site, is constructed, furnished and equipped as provided for in Sections 39-23-1 through 39-23-7 and Sections 20 through 33 of Chapter 535, Laws of 1997, as amended, the Department of Finance and Administration shall lease the facility for a period not exceeding fifty (50) years to a nonprofit corporation whose primary purpose for incorporation is the support and improvement of a children’s museum in Mississippi. The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease shall be considered a sufficient consideration. The lease shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease shall not amount to a donation of state property. Upon the expiration of the fifty-year lease term, the property leased, conveyed or transferred under this section shall revert back to the controlling agency or to the State of Mississippi.

The State of Mississippi shall retain all mineral rights to such property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 535, § 19; Laws, 1999, ch. 589, § 136; Laws, 2001, ch. 600, § 63; Laws, 2004, ch. 451, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 575, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2006.).